Massachusetts, session 194th, H2463.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 5A ½, the
following section:—
Section 5A ¾ - Notwithstanding any general or special law to contrary, Whenever the
commissioner determines that the inoculation of the general public by, or the administration to
the general public of, any antitoxin, serum, vaccine or other analogous product is essential in the
interest of the public health, and that supply for universal administration is insufficient, the
department shall ensure that funeral home directors and funeral workers are included in the same
category as health care providers in terms of prioritization of access.
of 1